Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 7. Peace Officer Standards and Training Commission

§ 9-1-701.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Commission” means the peace officer standards and training commission;

“County” means any county which has a law enforcement unit in its jurisdiction;

“Detention officer” means a person who is employed by a county or municipality on a full-time basis to care for, supervise and control persons detained in a jail or holding facility;

“Director” means the executive director of the commission;

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, child or parent;

“Law enforcement unit” means a public agency having police power and charged with enforcing state criminal statutes or municipal ordinances;

“Municipality” means an incorporated city or town which has a law enforcement unit in its jurisdiction;

“Part-time or reserve peace officer” means any person having peace officer authority acting less than full time in the service of any county, municipality or state agency, whether compensated or not;

“Peace officer” means a person as defined by W.S.

7-2-101

;

“Peace officer training” means an approved school or local peace officer training program authorized by the commission to train peace officers;

“Permanent basis” means employed full time as a peace officer;

“This act” means W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-711

;

“Dispatcher” means a person who is employed by a state, county or municipal law enforcement agency, fire service or licensed ambulance service on a full or part-time basis, to answer and dispatch calls for emergency and nonemergency situations via designated law enforcement and emergency telecommunications equipment;

“Certified correctional officer” means a person who is employed by the Wyoming department of corrections on a full-time basis to care for, supervise, control and maintain custody of persons confined in Wyoming department of corrections institutions and who has completed all requirements for certification as a correctional officer under this act;

“Correctional officer” means a person who is employed by the Wyoming department of corrections on a full-time basis to care for, supervise and maintain custody of persons confined in Wyoming department of corrections institutions;

“Correctional officer training” means an approved Wyoming department of corrections preservice academy or other correctional officer training program authorized by the commission to train correctional officers for the state;

“Part-time correctional officer” means a person is employed by the Wyoming department of corrections on a part-time basis to care for, supervise and maintain custody of persons confined in Wyoming department of corrections institutions.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:42; Laws 1975, ch. 189, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1901; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 142, § 1; 1991, ch. 109, § 2; 2001, ch. 180, § 2; 2005, ch. 176, § 2; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(xiv) through (a)(xvii).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "9-1-711" for "9-1-709" in (a)(xii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Game and fish personnel serving as bear management officers

were not performing the functions of a “peace officer” and thus the officers' alleged negligence in monitoring a grizzly bear who mauled a hunter did not give rise to liability under §

1-39-112

.Peterson v. Wyoming Game And Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

Quoted

in

Hurst v. State, 698 P.2d 1130,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

EEOC v. Wyoming, 514 F. Supp. 595, 1981 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12203 (D. Wyo. 1981); Vigil v. Ruettgers, 887 P.2d 521,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 9-1-702.
Created; membership; removal; compensation; meetings; publication of procedures; standards for certified training; powers and duties.

The peace officer standards and training commission is created. It shall be composed of the attorney general and the following six (6) members who shall be appointed by the governor for a term of three (3) years commencing July 1, 1991, who may be reappointed to subsequent terms and who may be removed by the governor as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

:

One (1) representative of a municipal law enforcement agency;

One (1) representative of a county law enforcement agency;

One (1) representative of a state law enforcement agency;

One (1) person who is actively engaged in law enforcement training; and

Two (2) persons at large.

Members of the commission shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for travel and per diem expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The commission shall hold at least two (2) meetings per year.

With the approval of the governor, the commission shall establish and publish its procedures.

The commission shall establish standards for certification of peace officer training. The commission shall establish:

Requirements concerning courses of study, attendance, equipment and facilities for peace officer training;

Qualifications for peace officer training instructors;

Basic training requirements for peace officers appointed on a permanent basis;

Basic training requirements for part-time or reserve peace officers;

Basic training requirements for detention officers;

Categories or classifications of advanced in-service training programs and minimum courses of study and attendance requirements with respect to the categories or classifications.

The commission shall:

Recommend to the director studies, surveys and reports regarding the purposes of this act;

Visit and inspect any peace officer training program at any appropriate time;

Adopt reasonable rules and regulations pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Prescribe reasonable minimum qualifications relating solely to physical, mental and moral fitness for persons recruited, appointed or retained as peace officers or dispatchers by the state or a political subdivision;

Grant, suspend or revoke certification of peace officers or dispatchers for substantial failure to comply with this act or the rules of the commission, subject to the contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The commission shall establish course requirements and continuing education requirements for coroner training.

The commission shall establish course requirements and continuing education requirements for public safety dispatcher training.

The commission may establish examination and certification fees for administering its duties under this article in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

. Revenues received pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to a separate account and are continuously appropriated to the attorney general to be expended for the actual direct and indirect costs of providing the services generating the revenues.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations to:

Establish course requirements and continuing education requirements for correctional officer training; and

Establish procedures and criteria for the issuance, denial, renewal, suspension and revocation of correctional officer certification. Grounds for denial, suspension or revocation of certification shall include the substantial failure to comply with this act or the rules of the commission. Proceedings regarding a denial, suspension or revocation of certification shall be subject to the contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 178, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:43; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1902; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 142, § 1; 1991, ch. 60, § 1; ch. 109, § 1; 2003, ch. 120, § 2; 2005, ch. 176, § 2; ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 131, § 1.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 176, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, added (k).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account in the enterprise fund” in (j).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2007 amendments. —

effective February 27, 2007, in (f)(iv) inserted “or dispatchers” preceding “as peace officers”; in (f)(v) inserted “or dispatchers” following “of peace officers.”

Laws 2007, ch. 131, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-1-701(a)(xii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Quoted

in

Graham v. Wyoming Peace Officer Stds. & Training Comm'n, 737 P.2d 1060,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 458

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 9-1-703.
Director; appointment; term; powers and duties.

The director of the commission shall be appointed by the commission with the approval of the governor. The director shall hold office at the pleasure of the commission and with the concurrence of the governor. He shall perform the functions and duties assigned to him by the chairman of the commission.

With the approval of the commission, the director may:

Appoint officers, employees, agents and consultants and prescribe their duties;

Inspect and approve peace officer and correctional officer training academies, issue certificates of approval to academies and revoke approval or certificates;

Certify as qualified instructors at approved peace officer and correctional officer training academies and issue appropriate certificates to instructors;

Certify peace officers, correctional officers and dispatchers who have satisfactorily completed the basic training programs as outlined in this act and issue appropriate certificates to peace officers, correctional officers and dispatchers;

Cause surveys to be made relating to the establishment and operation of peace officer and correctional officer training academies;

Consult and cooperate with peace officer and correctional officer training academies for the development of the basic and advanced training programs for peace officers;

Consult and cooperate with universities, colleges, junior colleges and other institutions for the development of specialized courses of study in the state for peace officers in the areas of police science, police administration and the social sciences and other related areas;

Consult and cooperate with other departments and agencies concerned with peace officer and correctional officer training;

Report to the commission at regular meetings of the commission and at other times as required and recommend denial, suspension or revocation of certification of a peace officer, correctional officer or dispatcher to the commission as deemed necessary;

Consult and cooperate with universities, colleges, junior colleges and other institutions for the development of specialized courses of study in the state for correctional officers in the areas of inmate management, group dynamics, correctional facility operations, the social sciences and other related areas.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 178, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:44; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1903; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 60, § 1; 2005, ch. 176, § 2; 2007, ch. 131, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “and correctional officer” or a variant throughout (b), and added (b)(x).

The 2007 amendment

inserted references to dispatchers in (b)(iv) and (b)(ix) and made related stylistic changes.

Laws 2007, ch. 131, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2007.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-1-701(a)(xii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of supervisory officials and governmental entities for having failed to adequately train, supervise, or control individual peace officers who violate plaintiff's civil rights under 42 USC § 1983, 70 ALR Fed 17.

§ 9-1-704.
Qualifications for employment as a peace officer; loss of certification for felony conviction; termination from employment.

Within fifteen (15) days after the appointment, termination, resignation or death of any peace officer or dispatcher, written notice thereof shall be given to the commission by the employing agency.

No county, sheriff, mayor, municipality, state agency or any other person authorized by law to appoint peace officers in this state shall appoint any person as a peace officer who does not meet the following qualifications. The person shall:

Be a United States citizen;

Be an adult;

Be fingerprinted. Local, state and national fingerprint files shall be searched to determine if the applicant has a criminal record;

Not have been convicted of a crime for which he could have been imprisoned in a federal penitentiary or state prison;

Hold a high school diploma or evidence of an equivalent achievement;

Have good moral character as determined by a background investigation. The hiring agency shall complete a background investigation as defined by the commission of any applicant for employment as a peace officer before the applicant may be employed or begin training as a peace officer;

Be free of any physical, emotional or mental conditions which might adversely affect his performance of duty as a peace officer. Physical condition shall be evaluated by a person licensed to practice medicine. Emotional and mental conditions shall be evaluated by a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist;

Pass an oral interview examination by the hiring agency.

Notwithstanding any general, specific or local law or charter to the contrary, no person shall receive an original appointment on a permanent basis or hold an appointment on a permanent basis as a peace officer unless the person has been awarded a certificate by the director attesting to his satisfactory completion of an approved peace officer basic training program.

No person shall be appointed as a peace officer on a permanent basis for more than one (1) year unless within one (1) year from the date of appointment he is awarded a certificate by the director attesting that he satisfactorily completed a commission approved peace officer’s basic training program.

No person shall be appointed as a detention officer on a permanent basis for more than one (1) year unless within one (1) year from the date of appointment he is awarded a certificate by the director attesting that he satisfactorily completed a commission approved detention officer basic training program.

Every person who is appointed as a part-time or reserve peace officer shall forfeit his position unless within two (2) years from the date of his appointment he is awarded a certificate by the director attesting that he satisfactorily completed a commission approved peace officer basic training program.

Notwithstanding subsections (c) through (e) of this section, the commission may waive the basic peace officer training program and certify those applicants who can pass a written examination provided by the commission and an oral interview attesting to the applicant’s ability in law enforcement. The applicant shall prove that he satisfactorily completed a basic peace officer training program which in the commission’s opinion is comparable to that required by this section before waiver is granted.

A person who is convicted of a felony after his appointment as a peace officer is ineligible for continued employment as a peace officer. If the person has been certified under this section, his certification shall be automatically revoked on the date of his conviction. The director shall notify the person and the person’s employing agency upon revocation of certification under this subsection.

In the case of termination of a peace officer, the employing agency shall notify the commission and the officer, in writing, of the termination, setting forth in detail the facts and reasons for the termination. If the officer is terminated for failure to comply with this act, or rules promulgated under it, the notice shall so specify. Any officer who has been terminated may present a written statement to the commission responding to the claims made against him or setting forth the facts and reasons for the termination as he believes them to be, and that statement shall become a permanent part of the file. A potential employer may contact the commission to inquire as to the facts and reasons an officer was terminated from any previous employing agency. Unless otherwise prohibited by law, the commission shall, upon request provide to the potential employer all pertinent information which is in its possession.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a certificate issued by the commission, the commission shall notify the party named in the court order and the employing agency of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the certificate in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a certificate withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 178, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:45; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1904; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 142, § 1; 1990, ch. 30, § 1; 1991, ch. 60, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2007, ch. 131, § 1.

The 2007 amendment

substituted “dispatcher” for “detention officer” in (a).

Laws 2007, ch. 131, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (j), see § 9-1-701(a)(xii).

Quoted

in

McKenzie v. Dovala, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 3844, 242 F.3d 967 (10th Cir. 2001).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sex discrimination in law enforcement and corrections employment, 53 ALR Fed 31.

§ 9-1-705.
Peace officer attending authorized school or training program entitled to wages and expenses.

Any peace officer attending any school or training program authorized by the commission for the purpose of meeting the requirements of W.S.

9-1-704

shall be paid his wages as a peace officer by his employer. He shall also receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses as determined by his employer.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 178, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:46; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1905; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-706.
Certification without compliance with requirements of W.S. 9-1-704; applicability of civil service provisions.

Any person who has been employed on a permanent basis as a peace officer for ten (10) consecutive years prior to July 1, 1973, and who is currently employed as a peace officer, shall be certified as a peace officer by the director without having complied with W.S. 9-1-704(b) and (c).

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 142, § 2.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to except any peace officer from the provisions or requirements of civil service.

An employing agency may establish qualifications and standards for hiring and training that exceed the minimum set by the commission.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 178, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:47; Laws 1973, ch. 87, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1906; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-1-701(a)(xii).

§ 9-1-707.
Commission may accept grants.

The commission may accept grants of money or materials or property of any kind from the federal government, the state, any agency or political subdivision of the state or any person upon the terms and conditions imposed by the grantor.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 178, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:48; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1907; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-708.
Certificate required for permanent employment; temporary employment; waiver or modification of training requirements; wages during training; grandfather provisions.

Notwithstanding any general, specific or local law or charter to the contrary, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person shall be employed as a dispatcher on a permanent or temporary basis unless the person has been awarded a certificate by the director of the peace officer standards and training commission attesting to his satisfactory completion of a commission approved dispatcher basic training program. No county, sheriff, mayor, municipality, state agency or any other person authorized by law to employ dispatchers in this state shall employ any person as a dispatcher who does not meet the employment standards established by commission rule.

A person shall only be employed as a dispatcher on a permanent or temporary basis for two (2) years unless within two (2) years from the original date of employment he is awarded a certificate by the peace officer standards and training commission attesting that he satisfactorily completed a commission approved dispatcher basic training program. The commission may extend the two (2) year time requirement of this section upon the written application of the dispatcher and his employer. The application shall explain the circumstances which make the extension necessary. Factors which the commission may consider in granting or denying the extension include the illness of a dispatcher or a member of his immediate family or the absence of reasonable access to the basic course. The commission shall not grant an extension exceeding two hundred ten (210) days.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the commission may waive the basic dispatcher training program and certify those applicants who pass a written examination provided by the commission and an oral interview attesting to the applicant’s ability in law enforcement, fire and ambulance dispatching. The applicant shall prove that he satisfactorily completed a basic dispatcher training program which in the commission’s opinion is comparable to that required by this section before waiver is granted.

Any dispatcher attending any school or training program authorized by the commission for the purpose of meeting the requirements of this section shall be paid his wages as a dispatcher by his employer. He shall also receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses as determined by his employer.

Any person who has been employed on a permanent basis as a dispatcher for three (3) consecutive years prior to July 1, 1991, or who has attended and successfully completed the peace officer’s standards and training commission “communications personnel basic course” offered within the state of Wyoming, and who is currently employed as a dispatcher, shall be certified as a dispatcher by the director without having complied with subsection (b) or (c) of this section.

A person who is convicted of a felony after his employment as a dispatcher is ineligible for continued employment as a dispatcher. If the person has been certified under this section, his certification shall be automatically revoked on the date of his conviction. The director shall notify the person and the person’s employing agency upon revocation of certification under this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to except any dispatcher from any civil service provision or requirement.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 109, § 1; 2007, ch. 131, § 1.

The 2007 amendment

added the last sentence in (a); and added (f), redesignating existing paragraphs accordingly.

Laws 2007, ch. 131, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2007.

§ 9-1-709.
Peace officers; retirement and disability credentials.

The director of the peace officer standards and training commission shall authorize the issuance of a retirement or disability identification card to a retired or disabled peace officer upon receipt of an application meeting the requirements of subsection (b) of this section and payment of the required fee.

The application for an identification card under this section shall be signed and verified by the applicant and shall include:

The applicant’s name and any other identifying information the commission may require;

Written verification from the employing agency, in a form satisfactory to the director, that the applicant prior to his retirement or disability was employed by a law enforcement unit in this state and was certified as a peace officer in good standing under this act;

Proof in a form satisfactory to the director, that the applicant has qualified for retirement under a state or local government retirement system as a peace officer member or suffered injury in the line of duty as a peace officer in this state which resulted in total or partial disability. For purposes of this section total or partial disability shall be determined by provisions of the retirement system of which the applicant was a member at the time of his injury, but the applicant need not qualify for disability benefits under the system in order to meet the requirements of this section.

At the request of the director of the peace officer standards and training commission, the department of transportation shall prepare and issue an identification card under this section which shall contain:

A distinguishing number assigned to the applicant;

The applicant’s full legal name and resident address;

A brief description of the applicant including sex, height and weight;

The applicant’s picture;

Information identifying the applicant as a retired or disabled peace officer of the state of Wyoming including the name of the law enforcement unit employing the applicant and the highest rank held by the applicant;

The certification level held by the applicant under the peace officers standards and training commission.

Identification cards issued under this section shall not expire. The commission shall keep records of data contained in identification cards and may confirm the authenticity of the card to any person.

Upon submission by the applicant of a verified statement to the peace officers standards and training commission that an identification card issued under this section has been lost, destroyed or mutilated, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a new identification card upon furnishing the same documentary evidence required for issuance of an original identification card and paying the fee required by subsection (f) of this section.

Each applicant for an identification card under this section shall pay to the commission a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) which shall be credited to the highway fund.

No person shall:

Possess any cancelled, fictitious, fraudulently altered or fraudulently obtained identification card issued under this section;

Lend his identification card to any other person or knowingly permit its use by another;

Display or represent any identification card not issued to him as being his card;

Photograph, photostat, duplicate or in any way reproduce any identification card or facsimile thereof in such a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid identification card issued under this section;

Procure an identification card under this section by false swearing, fraud or false statement of any kind or in any form.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (g) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 180, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-1-701(a)(xii).

§ 9-1-710.
Qualifications for employment as a correctional officer; termination of employment; certification without compliance with the requirements of this section.

Within fifteen (15) days after the appointment, termination, resignation or death of any correctional officer or certified correctional officer, written notice thereof shall be given to the commission by the employing agency.

A state agency or any other person authorized by law to appoint correctional officers in this state shall not appoint any person as a correctional officer on or after July 1, 2005, who does not meet the following qualifications. The person shall:

Be a United States citizen;

Be an adult;

Submit to fingerprinting and a search of local, state and national fingerprint files to determine whether the applicant has a criminal record, with a copy of the responses sent to the commission;

Not have been convicted of any crime for which the applicant could have been punished by imprisonment in a federal or a state penitentiary, unless his conviction is reversed or annulled or he receives a pardon;

Hold a high school diploma or equivalent achievement, with proof forwarded to the commission;

Be of good moral character as determined by a background investigation. The hiring agency shall complete a background investigation as defined by the commission of any new applicant for employment as a correctional officer before the applicant may be employed or begin training as a correctional officer;

Be free of any physical, emotional or mental conditions which might adversely affect the applicant’s performance as a correctional officer. Physical condition shall be evaluated by a person licensed to practice medicine and by application of a standardized physical fitness performance test as specified by the hiring agency. Emotional and mental conditions shall be evaluated by a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist;

Successfully pass an oral interview examination and other preemployment examinations specified by the hiring agency.

A person shall not receive an original appointment as a certified correctional officer or hold an appointment on a permanent basis as a certified correctional officer unless the person has been awarded a certificate by the director attesting to his satisfactory completion of an approved correctional officer basic training program and has demonstrated the core competencies of a correctional officer as defined by the employing agency in cooperation with the commission.

A person shall not be appointed as a correctional officer on a permanent basis on or after July 1, 2006 unless within one (1) year from the date of his original appointment he is awarded a certificate by the director attesting that he satisfactorily completed a commission approved correctional officer’s basic training program and has demonstrated the core competencies of a correctional officer as defined by the employing agency in cooperation with the commission. The commission may extend the one (1) year time requirement of this section upon the written application of the correctional officer and his employer. The application shall explain the circumstances which make the extension necessary. Factors which the commission may consider in granting or denying the extension include the illness of a correctional officer or a member of his immediate family or the absence of reasonable access to the basic course. The commission shall not grant an extension exceeding one hundred eighty (180) days.

Every person who is appointed as a part-time correctional officer on or after July 1, 2005, shall forfeit his position unless within two (2) years from the date of his appointment he is awarded a certificate by the director attesting that he satisfactorily completed a commission approved correctional officer basic training program and has demonstrated the core competencies of a correctional officer as defined by the employing agency in cooperation with the commission.

Notwithstanding subsections (b) through (e) of this section, the commission may, upon the recommendation of the employing agency, waive the basic correctional officer training program and certify those applicants who can pass a written examination provided by the commission and an oral interview attesting to the applicant’s ability and core competencies in corrections. The applicant shall prove that he satisfactorily completed a basic correctional officer training program which in the commission’s opinion is comparable to that required by this section before waiver is granted.

Any correctional officer attending any school or training program authorized by the commission for the purpose of meeting the requirements of this section shall be paid his wages as a correctional officer by his employer. He shall also receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses as determined by his employer.

A person who is convicted of a felony after his appointment as a correctional officer is ineligible for continued employment as a correctional officer. If the person has been certified under this section, his certification shall be automatically revoked on the date of his conviction. The director shall notify the person and the person’s employing agency upon revocation of certification under this subsection as defined by the commission.

In the case of termination of a certified correctional officer, the employing agency shall notify the commission and the officer, in writing, of the termination, setting forth in detail the facts and reasons for the termination. If the officer is terminated for failure to comply with this act, or rules promulgated under it, the notice shall so specify. Any officer who has been terminated may present a written statement to the commission responding to the claims made against him or setting forth the facts and reasons for the termination as he believes them to be, and that statement shall become a permanent part of the file. A potential employer may contact the commission to inquire as to the facts and reasons an officer was terminated from any previous employing agency. Unless otherwise prohibited by law, the commission shall, upon request, provide to the potential employer all pertinent information which is in its possession.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a certificate issued by the commission, the commission shall notify the party named in the court order and the employing agency of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the certificate in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a certificate withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

Any person who has been employed on a permanent basis as a correctional officer for five (5) consecutive years, and who is employed as a correctional officer by the Wyoming department of corrections on July 6, 2006, shall be certified as a certified correctional officer by the director without having complied with subsections (b) through (e) of this section.

The Wyoming department of corrections may establish qualifications and standards for hiring and training that exceed the minimum set by the commission.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 176, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 176, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 9-1-711.
Certification and hiring of currently certified peace officers, detention officers and dispatchers.

A law enforcement unit may, following verification from the commission that a person is currently certified by the commission as a peace officer, detention officer or dispatcher, appoint that person to a respectively certified position without further investigation or examination.

The commission shall provide in its rules for the certification to a prospective hiring law enforcement unit that a person is currently certified by the commission as a peace officer, detention officer or dispatcher.

It is the sole responsibility of the prospective hiring law enforcement unit to verify that the person is employed in good standing by another law enforcement unit in this state.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 63, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 63, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2010.